Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-539
Game bird nests or eggs; prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

It shall be unlawful to take or needlessly destroy the nests or eggs of any game birds. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be fined at least fifty dollars.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 259.